Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
KIDNAPPING AND RELATED OFFENSES; CRIMINAL COERCION

§707-720 Kidnapping. (1) A person
commits the offense of kidnapping if the person intentionally or knowingly
restrains another person with intent to:

(a) Hold that person for ransom or reward;

(b) Use that person as a shield or hostage;

(c) Facilitate the commission of a felony or flight
thereafter;

(d) Inflict bodily injury upon that person or
subject that person to a sexual offense;

(e) Terrorize that person or a third person;

(f) Interfere with the performance of any
governmental or political function; or

(g) Unlawfully obtain the labor or services of that
person, regardless of whether related to the collection of a debt.

(2) Except as provided in subsection (3),
kidnapping is a class A felony.

(3) In a prosecution for kidnapping, it is a
defense which reduces the offense to a class B felony that the defendant
voluntarily released the victim, alive and not suffering from serious or
substantial bodily injury, in a safe place prior to trial. [L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1; am L 1986, c 314, §53; gen ch 1992; am L 2008, c 147, §2]

Case Notes

Evidence held sufficient to show defendant restrained victim
to subject victim to sexual offense. 61 H. 475, 605 P.2d 75 (1980).

Trial judge erred in refusing to instruct jury regarding the
possible merger of the robbery and kidnapping counts against defendant. 77 H.
17, 881 P.2d 504 (1994).

Prosecution adduced substantial evidence from which a person
of reasonable caution could conclude that defendant intentionally or knowingly
restrained officer and intended to inflict bodily injury upon officer in
violation of subsection (1)(d) where officer testified that defendant had
pinned officer's arm against car's steering wheel and dragged officer thirty
yards down the street while officer was hanging outside the vehicle. 95 H.
465, 24 P.3d 661 (2001).

Where handgun constituted a significant piece of evidence
pertaining to the state of mind requisite to the charged offense of
kidnapping-with-the-intent-to-terrorize, trial court's admission of testimony
regarding the handgun was not erroneous because the testimony's probative value
outweighed any potential prejudice. 118 H. 493, 193 P.3d 409 (2008).

Where jurors could have found that defendant's culpable acts
of either the morning or afternoon of April 10, 2004 established the conduct
element of the kidnapping count, and trial court did not issue a specific
unanimity instruction to the jury regarding defendant's kidnapping charge,
appellate court erred in affirming trial court's kidnapping conviction under
this section. 118 H. 493, 193 P.3d 409 (2008).

A specific unanimity (jury) instruction is not required where
(1) the offense is not defined in such a manner as to preclude it from being
proved as a continuous offense and (2) the prosecution alleges, adduces
evidence of, and argues that the defendant's action constituted a continuous
course of conduct; thus, a specific unanimity instruction was not required
where prosecution alleged a continuous course of conduct with respect to
defendant's kidnapping charge under this section, but was required for
defendant's attempted first degree sexual assault charge under §707-730. 121
H. 339, 219 P.3d 1126 (2009).

There was overwhelming and compelling evidence tending to
show defendant guilty beyond a reasonable doubt of kidnapping, where defendant
restrained victim intentionally or knowingly, with intent to inflict bodily
injury upon victim or subject victim to a sexual offense or terrorize victim,
by, inter alia, striking victim in the face and back of the head several times
specifically in response to victim's request to let victim go and victim's
attempts to escape. 126 H. 267, 270 P.3d 997 (2011).

There was a rational basis for the jury to find defendant
guilty of unlawful imprisonment in the first degree, had the jury been given
the appropriate instruction. The failure to instruct the jury on a lesser
included offense for which the evidence provided a rational basis warranted
vacating defendant's conviction for kidnapping. 131 H. 43, 314 P.3d 120
(2013).

Under §701-109(4)(c), unlawful imprisonment in the first
degree is a lesser-included offense of kidnapping because unlawful imprisonment
in the first degree involves a less culpable mental state than kidnapping. 131
H. 43, 314 P.3d 120 (2013).

The purpose of allowing a mitigating defense would be
undermined by only requiring the State to demonstrate that the victim was
suffering from a substantial bodily injury at the time of the victim's release;
instead, evidence must have been adduced that demonstrates that the substantial
bodily injury was caused during the course of the kidnapping by defendant or by
the co-defendant as defendant's accomplice, or both. 131 H. 365, 319 P.3d 284
(2013).

The State was only required to disprove one of the elements
of the class B mitigating defense beyond a reasonable doubt to establish that
the defendant "failed to fulfill" one element and therefore was not
entitled to the defense. Defendant was not entitled to the class B mitigating
defense where the jury's responses to the special interrogatories established
that the State proved beyond a reasonable doubt facts negativing the first and
third elements of the defense. 131 H. 365, 319 P.3d 284 (2013).

No evidence that defendant voluntarily released the victim in
a safe place. 6 H. App. 77, 711 P.2d 1303 (1985).

Trial court's jury instruction that "terrorize means the
risk of causing another person serious alarm for his or her personal safety"
had no basis in Hawaii's criminal statutes, derogated the culpable state of
mind required for conviction under subsection (1)(e), and was not harmless
error. 98 H. 208 (App.), 46 P.3d 1092 (2002).

A defense under subsection (3) imposed upon the State the
burden of proving beyond a reasonable doubt that defendant (a) did not release
the victim alive, (b) prior to trial, (c) voluntarily, (d) the victim was not
suffering from serious or substantial bodily injury, or (e) did not release
the victim in a safe place; if and when the State satisfied its burden of
disproving one or more of these five elements, it disproved the defense;
failure of the jury instructions to connect "release" and "prior
to trial" was harmless beyond a reasonable doubt. 102 H. 346 (App.), 76
P.3d 589 (2003).

Circuit court did not err in convicting defendant of a class
A felony under this section where the jury found that when defendant released
victim, victim was suffering from serious or substantial bodily harm; a doctor
testified that victim's concussion coupled with victim's loss of consciousness
of unknown duration created a substantial risk of death. 123 H. 456 (App.),
235 P.3d 1168 (2010).

Other evidence and victim's testimony that defendant drove
victim's van from urban Honolulu to Kaneohe provided sufficient evidence to
convict defendant of kidnapping under this section. 123 H. 456 (App.), 235
P.3d 1168 (2010).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next